Utah statutes.
78B-12-201.   Procedure -- Documentation -- Stipulation.

(1)  In any matter in which child support is ordered, the moving party shall submit:

(a)  a completed child support worksheet;

(b)  the financial verification required by Subsection 78B-12-203(5);

(c)  a written statement indicating whether or not the amount of child support requested is consistent with the guidelines; and

(d)  the information required under Subsection (3).

(2) (a)  If the documentation of income required under Subsection (1) is not available, a verified representation of the other party's income by the moving party, based on the best evidence available, may be submitted.

(b)  The evidence shall be in affidavit form and may only be offered after a copy has been provided to the other party in accordance with Utah Rules of Civil Procedure or Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, in an administrative proceeding.

(3)  Upon the entry of an order in a proceeding to establish paternity or to establish, modify, or enforce a support order, each party shall file identifying information and shall update that information as changes occur with the court that conducted the proceeding.

(a) The required identifying information shall include the person's social security number, driver's license number, residential and mailing addresses, telephone numbers, the name, address and telephone number of employers, and any other data required by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services.

(b)  Attorneys representing the office in child support services cases are not required to file the identifying information required by Subsection (3)(a).

(4)  A stipulated amount for child support or combined child support and alimony is adequate under the guidelines if the stipulated child support amount or combined amount equals or exceeds the base child support award required by the guidelines.

